Nevada, session 83, SB166.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 687B.383 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
687B.383 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, an
insurer shall not:
(a) Refuse to issue;
(b) Cancel;
(c) Refuse to renew; or
(d) Increase a premium or rate for,
 a policy of insurance based [solely] on the specific breed or
mixture of breeds of a dog that is harbored or owned on an
applicable property.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not prohibit an insurer
from:
(a) Refusing to issue;
(b) Cancelling;
(c) Refusing to renew; or
(d) Imposing a reasonable increase to a premium or rate for,
 a policy of insurance based on sound underwriting and actuarial
principles on the basis that a particular dog which is harbored or
owned on an applicable property is known to be dangerous or
vicious or has been declared to be dangerous or vicious in
accordance with NRS 202.500.
3. An insurer may not ask or inquire about the specific breed or
mixture of breeds of a dog which is harbored or owned on an
applicable property except to ask if the dog is known to be
dangerous or vicious or has been declared to be dangerous or
vicious in accordance with NRS 202.500.
4. As used in this section, “policy of insurance” means:
(a) A policy of homeowner’s insurance;
(b) A policy of renter’s insurance;
(c) A policy of insurance which covers a manufactured home or
a mobile home; [and]
(d) A policy of insurance which covers a multi-family
residential dwelling; and
(e) An umbrella policy as defined in NRS 687B.440.
Sec. 2. NRS 319.600 is hereby amended to read as follows:
319.600 1. The Division shall, subject to the availability of
funds appropriated for such a purpose, develop and implement a
supportive housing grant program for the purpose of awarding
grants for the development of supportive housing and the provision
of supportive housing services. The program must include a process
for applying for a grant to:
(a) Procure and develop supportive housing;
(b) Train and build the capacity of a supportive housing
partnership;
(c) Fund the operation of a supportive housing partnership; and
(d) Analyze the progress of supportive housing in this State.
2. Any recipient of a grant for supportive housing must agree
in writing to [comply] :
(a) Comply with all applicable provisions of chapter 118A of
NRS.
(b) Allow a tenant in the supportive housing to keep at least
one pet, subject to any applicable federal, state and local laws,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
regulations and ordinances related to public health, animal
control or the prevention of cruelty to animals.
3. The Division shall consult with the Nevada Interagency
Advisory Council on Homelessness to Housing created by NRS
232.4981 before approving any application for a grant pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 1.
4. The Division shall adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section. The regulations must prescribe, without
limitation:
(a) The criteria for eligibility to receive money from the
supportive housing grant program; and
(b) Procedures for the submission and review of applications to
receive money from the supportive housing grant program.
5. On or before December 1 of each year that the supportive
housing grant program is funded, the Division shall submit a report
to the Chair of the Nevada Interagency Advisory Council on
Homelessness to Housing, the Governor and the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Legislature, or to
the Legislative Commission, if the Legislature is not in session. The
report must include:
(a) Information on and feedback from grant recipients; and
(b) Information on the use of grant money and participation in
the supportive housing grant program.
6. The Division may use a portion of the money in the Nevada
Supportive Housing Development Fund created by NRS 319.610 to
prepare the report required by subsection 5.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Pet” means a domesticated animal owned or possessed by
a person for the purpose of pleasure or companionship, including,
without limitation, a cat or dog.
(b) “Supportive housing” means subsidized housing that reduces
barriers to retaining housing that are caused by a person’s rental
history, criminal history and income through the provision of onsite
and offsite supportive services that are designed to assist a person
who has:
(1) A disabling behavioral or physical health condition; and
(2) Experienced:
(I) Homelessness or been at imminent risk of
homelessness; or
(II) Unnecessary institutionalization.
[(b)] (c) “Supportive services” includes, without limitation,
social services, community support services, case management
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
services, employment services, health care and behavioral health
treatment.
Sec. 3. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)